en: Vehicle body filler form: Aerosol/spray filler; Cartridge; Liquid/pourable filler; Paste (tub/can); Powder (mix with resin/hardener); Putty (tube); Two-part kit (filler + hardener); Other
el: Μορφή στόκου αμαξώματος οχήματος: Στόκος σε σπρέι/αεροζόλ; Φύσιγγα; Υγρός/χύδην στόκος; Πάστα (βαζάκι/κουτί); Σκόνη (ανάμειξη με ρητίνη/σκληρυντή); Στόκος (σωληνάριο); Κιτ δύο μερών (στόκος + σκληρυντής); Άλλο
ja: 車両用ボディフィラー形態: エアロゾル/スプレーフィラー; カートリッジ; 液状/流し込みフィラー; ペースト (容器/缶); パウダー (樹脂/硬化剤との混合); パテ (チューブ); 2 液キット (フィラー + 硬化剤); その他
ru: Форма автомобильной шпатлевки: Шпатлевка-аэрозоль/спрей; Картридж; Жидкая/заливочная шпатлевка; Паста (банка/ведро); Порошок (для смешивания со смолой/отвердителем); Шпатлевка (тюбик); Двухкомпонентный набор (шпатлевка + отвердитель); Другое
sv: Fysisk form av billackspackel: Sprutspackel (spray/aerosol); Patron; Flytande/hällbart fyllmedel; Pasta (burk/tub); Pulver (blandas med harts/härdare); Kitt (tub); Tvåkomponentskit (spackel + härdare); Övrigt
ko: 차량 차체 필러 형태: 에어로졸/스프레이 필러; 카트리지; 액상/붓는 필러; 페이스트(통/캔); 분말(수지/경화제와 혼합); 퍼티(튜브형); 2부분 키트(필러 + 경화제); 기타
pt-BR: Massa de reparo automotivo forma: Massa em aerossol/spray; Cartucho; Massa líquida/fluida; Pasta (pote/lata); Pó (misturar com resina/endurecedor); Massa (tubo); Kit de duas partes (massa + endurecedor); Outro
fr: Forme du mastic de carrosserie: Mastic en aérosol/vaporisateur; Cartouche; Mastic liquide/coulable; Pâte (pot/boîte); Poudre (à mélanger avec de la résine/du durcisseur); Mastic (tube); Kit bi-composant (mastic + durcisseur); Autre
es: Formato de masilla para carrocería: Masilla en aerosol/spray; Cartucho; Masilla líquida/para verter; Pasta (tarrina/lata); Polvo (mezcla con resina/endurecedor); Masilla (tubo); Kit de dos componentes (masilla + endurecedor); Otro
bg-BG: Форма на автомобилния кит/пълнител за каросерия: Кит аерозол/спрей; Патрон; Течен/наливен кит; Паста (туба/кутия); Прах (за смесване със смола/втвърдител); Кит (туба); Двукомпонентен комплект (кит + втвърдител); Друго
da: Form for karosserispartel: Aerosol-/sprayfiller; Patron; Flydende filler/filler til hældning; Pasta (bøtte/dåse); Pulver (blandes med harpiks/hærder); Spartelmasse (tube); Topartssæt (filler + hærder); Andet
zh-TW: 車輛補土型態: 氣霧/噴霧補土; 卡匣; 液體/可傾倒補土; 膏狀 (桶裝/罐裝); 粉末 (與樹脂/硬化劑混合); 補土 (管裝); 雙劑組 (補土 + 硬化劑); 其他
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės kėbulo užpildymo forma: Aerozolinis / purškiamas užpildas; Kasetė; Skystas / pilamas užpildas; Pasta (indelis / skardinė); Milteliai (maišyti su derva / kietikliu); Glaistas (tūbelė); Dviejų dalių rinkinys (užpildas ir kietiklis); Kita
nb: Form på bilsparkel: Aerosol/spray-fyller; Patron; Flytende fyller; Pasta (boks/spann); Pulver (blandes med harpiks/herder); Kitt (tube); Topartsett (fyller + herder); Annet
sl-SI: Oblika avtomobilskega kita: Aerosol/polnilo v pršilu; Kartuša; Tekoče/vlivno polnilo; Pasta (lonec/pločevinka); Prah (mešanje s smolo/trdilcem); Kit (tuba); Dvokomponentni komplet (polnilo in trdilec); Drugo
pt-PT: Forma do betume de carroçaria automóvel: Enchimento em aerossol/spray; Cartucho; Enchimento líquido/derramável; Pasta (tubo/lata); Pó (misturar com resina/endurecedor); Massa (tubo); Kit de duas partes (enchimento + endurecedor); Outro
hu: Jármű karosszériájának töltőanyaga: Aeroszol / Spray töltőanyag; Patron; Folyékony / Önthető töltőanyag; Paszta (tégely/doboz); Por (gyantával / edzővel keverendő); Gitt (tubus); Kétkomponensű készlet (töltőanyag + edző); Egyéb
it: Formato del riempitivo per carrozzeria del veicolo: Stucco aerosol/spray; Cartuccia; Stucco liquido/colabile; Pasta (vasetto/barattolo); Polvere (da mescolare con resina/indurente); Stucco (tubetto); Kit bicomponente (stucco + indurente); Altro
de: Form des Karosseriespachtels: Aerosol-/Sprühspachtel; Kartusche; Flüssiger/gießbarer Spachtel; Paste (Tube/Dose); Pulver (zum Mischen mit Harz/Härter); Kitt (Tube); Zweikomponenten-Kit (Spachtel + Härter); Sonstiges
hr-HR: Obrazac za popunjavanje karoserije vozila: Punilo u aerosolu/spreju; Kartuša; Tekuće/uljevno punilo; Pasta (posuda/limenka); Prah (miješa se sa smolom/učvršćivačem); Kit (tuba); Komplet od dva dijela (punilo + učvršćivač); Ostalo
fi: Ajoneuvon korimassan muoto: Aerosoli/suihkekitti; Patruuna; Nestemäinen/kaadettava kitti; Tahna (purkki/tölkki); Jauhe (sekoitetaan hartsiin/kovetteeseen); Kitti (tuubi); Kaksikomponenttipakkaus (kitti ja kovete); Muu
th: รูปแบบสารอุดตัวถังรถยนต์: ฟิลเลอร์แบบสเปรย์กระป๋อง; แบบหลอด; ฟิลเลอร์แบบของเหลว/เทได้; แบบครีม (กระปุก/กระป๋อง); แบบผง (ผสมเรซิน/ฮาร์ดเดนเนอร์); สีโป๊ว (แบบหลอด); ชุดคิทสองส่วน (ฟิลเลอร์ + ฮาร์ดเดนเนอร์); อื่นๆ
nl: Voertuigplamuur vorm: Spuitbus-/sprayplamuur; Patroon; Vloeibare/gietbare plamuur; Pasta (pot/blik); Poeder (mengen met hars/verharder); Plamuur (tube); Tweecomponentenkit (plamuur + verharder); Overig
tr: Araç gövde dolgu macunu formu: Aerosol/sprey dolgu; Kartuş; Sıvı/dökülebilir dolgu; Macun (kutu/teneke); Toz (reçine/sertleştirici ile karışım); Macun (tüp); İki bileşenli kit (dolgu + sertleştirici); Diğer
ro-RO: Forma chitului de caroserie auto: Chit tip aerosol/spray; Cartuș; Chit lichid/turnabil; Pastă (tub/cutie); Pulbere (amestec cu rășină/întăritor); Chit (tub); Kit bicomponent (chit + întăritor); Altele
vi: Dạng chất độn thân xe: Bột bả dạng bình xịt/phun; Ống tuýp; Bột bả dạng lỏng/rót; Dạng sệt (hộp/lon); Dạng bột (trộn với nhựa/chất đóng rắn); Matít (tuýp); Bộ hai thành phần (bột bả + chất đóng rắn); Khác
sk-SK: Formulár tmelu na opravu karosérie vozidla: Aerosólový tmel/tmel v spreji; Kartuša; Tekutý/nalievateľný tmel; Pasta (vanička/plechovka); Prášok (na zmiešanie so živicou/tvrdidlom); Tmel (tuba); Dvojzložková súprava (tmel a tvrdidlo); Iné
zh-CN: 车身填充剂形态: 气雾剂/喷雾填料; 管装; 液体/可浇注填料; 膏状 (桶装/罐装); 粉末 (与树脂/硬化剂混合); 腻子 (管装); 双组分套件 (填料 + 硬化剂); 其他
pl: Forma szpachli samochodowej: Szpachlówka w aerozolu/sprayu; Wkład; Szpachlówka w płynie; Pasta (pojemnik/puszka); Proszek (do wymieszania z żywicą/utwardzaczem); Kit (tubka); Zestaw dwuskładnikowy (szpachlówka + utwardzacz); Inne
cs: Forma tmelu na karoserii vozidla: Aerosolový tmel / plnič ve spreji; Kartuše; Tekutý/litý tmel; Pasta (tuba/plechovka); Prášek (k míchání s pryskyřicí/tvrdidlem); Tmel (tuba); Dvousložková sada (tmel + tvrdidlo); Jiné